Hawaii statutes.
§674-13 Legal adviser. The panel, in
accordance with section 28-8.3, shall obtain its own legal counsel to provide
legal services necessary to implement the purposes of this chapter. [L 1991, c
323, pt of §1; am L Sp 1993, c 8, §53; am L 2015, c 35, §40]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next